Missouri, session 2026, HB1679.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.709, to read as follows:
191.709. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Health care provider", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(2) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(3) "Vaccination status", a child's status with regard to whether the child has
received a vaccination against one or more diseases.
2. A health care provider shall not refuse, withhold from, or deny a minor child
any health care service based on the child's vaccination status.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.